Utah statutes.
41-3-507.   Special plates -- Record to be kept by users -- Reporting lost or stolen plates.

(1)  Each dealer, dismantler, manufacturer, remanufacturer, and transporter shall keep a written record of each special plate issued to it.

(2)  The record shall contain the name and address of any person to whom the plate has been assigned to be used.

(3)  The record shall account at all times for every special plate issued to the licensee, and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or any officer or employee of the division.

(4)  Lost or stolen special plates shall be reported immediately to the division.

